src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 14 front
!!€  räväkkä: räväkkä+A+Sg+Nom # flamboyant
!!€  räväköihin: räväkkä+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  räväkköihin: räväkkä+A+Pl+Ill
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_POHATTA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 t~0 back
!!€  pohatta: pohatta+A+Sg+Nom # fat-cat
!!€  pohattoina: pohatta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  pohatoissa: pohatta+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  pohattoihin: pohatta+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  pohatoihin: pohatta+A+Pl+Ill
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  A-final words with long vowels and syllable boundary

LEXICON ADJ_AINOA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 oa
!!€  ainoa: ainoa+A+Sg+Nom # singleton
!!€  ainoana: ainoa+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  ainoina: ainoa+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  ainoissa: ainoa+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  ainoihin: ainoa+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  ainoisiin: ainoa+A+Pl+Ill
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KORKEA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 ea
!!€  korkea: korkea+A+Sg+Nom # high
!!€  korkeana: korkea+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  korkeina: korkea+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  korkeissa: korkea+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  korkeihin: korkea+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  korkeisiin: korkea+A+Pl+Ill
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_JÄREÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 15 eä
!!€  järeä: järeä+A+Sg+Nom # rough
!!€  järeänä: järeä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  järeinä: järeä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  järeissä: järeä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  järeihin: järeä+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  järeisiin: järeä+A+Pl+Ill
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Lexicalised comparatives
!!  Most of the lexicalised comparatives are adjectives that go to this class.
!!  The comparatives that are not lexicalised inflect exactly the same, though
!!  some versions of morphology may cut off long comparative chains.

LEXICON ADJ_AIEMPI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 16 back
!!€  aiempi: aiempi+A+Sg+Nom # earlier
!!€  aiempana: aiempi+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  aiemmassa: aiempi+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  aiempina: aiempi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  aiemmista: aiempi+A+Pl+Ela
0:pi  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pa  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LÄHEMPI
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 16 front
!!€  lähempi: lähempi+A+Sg+Nom # closer
!!€  lähempänä: lähempi+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  lähemmässä: lähempi+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lähempinä: lähempi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  lähemmistä: lähempi+A+Pl+Ela
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:mä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:m  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:mä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:m  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Long vowel stems

LEXICON ADJ_VAPAA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 17 a
!!€  vapaa: vapaa+A+Sg+Nom # free
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no other bisyllabic long vowel stems in adjectives

LEXICON ADJ_PEEAA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 18 aa
!!€  peeaa: peeaa+A+Sg+Nom # bust
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MUU
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 18 uu
!!€  muu: muu+A+Sg+Nom # other
0:u  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_SYYPÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 18 ää
!!€  syypää: syypää+A+Sg+Nom # guilty
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no other monosyllabic long vowel stems for adjectives. For full
!!  listing of possibilities, see nouns.

LEXICON ADJ_GAY
!!  Some loan words inflect irregularly, either more along the written form or
!!  the pronunciation. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 21 gay
!!€  gay: gay+A+Sg+Nom # gay
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

!!  There are not many direct adjective loans in general.

!!  !Old e stems with i nominative
!!  Some of the old e stems have i nominative but e as stem vowel for singular
!!  forms. Most of these are not adjectives though, see full listing from the
!!  noun pages.
  
