src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aiempi+A:aiem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
alempi+A:alem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
edempi+A:edem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
ehompi+A:ehom  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
enempi+A:enem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
etelämpi+A:eteläm  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
gay+A:gay  ADJ_GAY  ;
grafiitinharmaa+A:grafiitinharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
harmaanruskea+A:harmaan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
harmaanruskea+A:harmaanruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
heleä+A:hele  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
helmenharmaa+A:helmen#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
hiekanruskea+A:hiekanruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
hiirenharmaa+A:hiiren#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
himmeä+A:himme  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
hulppea+A:hulppe  ADJ_AINOA  ;
hunajanmakea+A:hunajan#make  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
huoltovapaa+A:huolto#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
huomionkipeä+A:huomionkipe  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
idempi+A:idem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
iltapimeä+A:ilta#pime  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
julkaisuvapaa+A:julkaisu#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
juohea+A:juohe  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
jymäkkä+A:jymäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
jäljempi+A:jäljem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
jämäkkä+A:jämäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
kaamea+A:kaame  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kamferivapaa+A:kamferi#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
kanelinruskea+A:kanelinruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
karamellinruskea+A:karamellin#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
karmea+A:karme  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
kauempi+A:kauem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
kellanruskea+A:kellan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kellanruskea+A:kellan#ruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
kellanvihreä+A:kellanvihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
keltaharmaa+A:kelta#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
kiihkeä+A:kiihke  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
kivenharmaa+A:kiven#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
kopea+A:kope  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
korskea+A:korske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kullanvihreä+A:kullanvihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
kumea+A:kume  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
kuuranvalkea+A:kuuran#valke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
kuurosokea+A:kuurosoke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
laidempi+A:laidem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
laiskansitkeä+A:laiskan#sitke  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
lattea+A:latte  ADJ_AINOA  ;
lenseä+A:lense  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
liidunvalkea+A:liidun#valke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
likempi+A:likem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
loppusileä+A:loppu#sile  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
luonnonharmaa+A:luonnon#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
lähempi+A:lähem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
lännempi+A:lännem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
mahonginruskea+A:mahongin#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
mustaharmaa+A:musta#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
mustanruskea+A:mustan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
mustanruskea+A:mustanruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
muu+A:mu  ADJ_MUU  ;
möräkkä+A:möräk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
möyheä+A:möyhe  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
nuuskanruskea+A:nuuskan#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
näpsäkkä+A:näpsäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
näpäkkä+A:näpäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
oliivinruskea+A:oliivin#ruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
opintovapaa+A:opinto#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
pahempi+A:pahem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
parempi+A:parem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
peeaa+A:peea  ADJ_PEEAA  ;
perempi+A:perem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
pirteä+A:pirte  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
pitkänhuiskea+A:pitkän#huiske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
pohatta+A:pohat  ADJ_POHATTA  ;
pollea+A:polle  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
pullea+A:pulle  ADJ_AINOA  ;
punaisenharmaa+A:punaisenharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
puolikarkea+A:puolikarke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
puolipyöreä+A:puoli#pyöre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
puolisokea+A:puolisoke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
pönäkkä+A:pönäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
rotanharmaa+A:rotan#harma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
ruosteenruskea+A:ruosteen#ruske  ADJ_AINOA  ;
ruosteenruskea+A:ruosteenruske  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
rämäkkä+A:rämäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
rätväkkä+A:rätväk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
räväkkä+A:räväk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
römeä+A:röme  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
römäkkä+A:römäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
savenharmaa+A:savenharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
sinisenharmaa+A:sinisenharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
sinivalkea+A:sini#valke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
sinivihreä+A:sini#vihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
sisempi+A:sisem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
sorea+A:sore  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
suodatinkarkea+A:suodatin#karke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
syypää+A:syypä  ADJ_SYYPÄÄ  ;
syypää+A:syy#pä  ADJ_SYYPÄÄ  ;
syypää+A:syypä  ADJ_SYYPÄÄ  ;
sähäkkä+A:sähäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
taaempi+A:taaem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
taempi+A:taem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
tahmea+A:tahme  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
tasakorkea+A:tasa#korke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
tasaleveä+A:tasaleve  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
trustivapaa+A:trustivapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
tuonnempi+A:tuonnem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
tyhmänylpeä+A:tyhmän#ylpe  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
tömäkkä+A:tömäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
uhkea+A:uhke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
uhkea+A:uhke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
ulompi+A:ulom  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
vaaleanharmaa+A:vaaleanharma  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
valkea+A:valke  ADJ_AINOA  ;
vanhempi+A:vanhem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
varhempi+A:varhem  ADJ_AIEMPI  ;
vauhtisokea+A:vauhtisoke  ADJ_KORKEA  ;
verovapaa+A:vero#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
vihreä+A:vihre  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
vähempi+A:vähem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
ylempi+A:ylem  ADJ_LÄHEMPI  ;
yöpimeä+A:yö#pime  ADJ_JÄREÄ  ;
äitiysvapaa+A:äitiys#vapa  ADJ_VAPAA  ;
ärhäkkä+A:ärhäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
